Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3316
License holder; administrative review; procedure.

If the license holder makes a timely request for administrative review after receiving a notice under section 43-3314, the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The issues that may be determined at the hearing are limited to whether there has been an error in the identity of the license holder or in the determination of whether the license holder is a license holder described in subsection (1) of section 43-3314. The license holder may raise additional issues, including the reasonableness of a payment plan for a support order, to be preserved for appeal to the district court as provided under the Administrative Procedure Act. The Department of Health and Human Services shall stay the action to certify the license holder to the Department of Motor Vehicles and relevant licensing authorities as a license holder described in subsection (1) of section 43-3314 pending the outcome of the hearing. The Department of Health and Human Services shall notify the license holder of its decision.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 16.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.